California statutes. Education Code
(4) In any fiscal year, if funding is inadequate to accommodate the participation of all eligible school teams, first priority shall be given to schools meeting the criteria set forth in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3).

(c) Each team member who satisfactorily completes an institute authorized by this section shall receive a stipend, commensurate with the duration of the institute, of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), as determined by the University of California.

(d) Instruction provided by the institutes shall be consistent with state-adopted academic content standards and with the English language development standards
 adopted pursuant to Section 60811.

(e) (1) Instruction at the institutes shall consist of an intensive, sustained training period of no less than 40 hours nor more than 80 hours during the summer or during an intersession break or an equivalent instructor-led, online course and shall be supplemented during the following school year with no fewer than 80 hours nor more than 120 hours of instruction and schoolsite meetings, held on at least a monthly basis, to focus on the academic progress of English language learners at that school.

(2) Instruction at the institutes shall be of sufficient scope, depth, and duration to fully equip instructional personnel to offer a comprehensive and rigorous instructional program for English language learners and to assess pupil progress so these pupils can meet the academic content and performance standards adopted by the
 state board. The instruction shall be designed to increase the capacity of teachers and other school personnel to provide and assess standards-based instruction for English language learners.

(3) The instruction shall be multidisciplinary and focus on instruction in disciplines for which the state board has adopted academic content standards. The instruction shall also be research-based and provide effective models of professional development in order to ensure that instructional personnel increase their skills, at a minimum, in all of the following:

(A) Literacy instruction and assessment for diverse pupil populations, including instruction in the teaching of reading that is research-based and consistent with the balanced, comprehensive strategies required under Section 44757.

(B) English language development and
 second language acquisition strategies.

(C) Specially designed instruction and assessment in English.

(D) Application of appropriate assessment instruments to assess language proficiency and utilization of benchmarks for reclassification of pupils from English language learners to fully English proficient.

(E) Examination of pupil work as a basis for the alignment of standards, instruction, and assessment.

(F) Use of appropriate instructional materials to assist English language learners to attain academic content standards.

(G) Instructional technology and its integration into the school curriculum for English language learners.

(H) Parent involvement and effective practices for building partnerships with parents.

(f) A local educational agency may use its economic impact aid funds for purposes of this section.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that a local educational agency or postsecondary institution that offers an accredited program of professional preparation consider providing partial and proportional credit toward satisfaction of the course requirements to an enrolled candidate who satisfactorily completes a California English Language Development Institute program if the program has been certified by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing as meeting preparation standards.

(h) This section does not prohibit a team member from attending an institute authorized by this section in more than one academic year.

(i) This section shall not apply to the University of California unless and until the Regents of the University of California act, by resolution, to make it applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 77.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

99222.

The Regents of the University of California are requested to develop jointly with the Trustees of the California State University and the independent colleges and universities, the High School Mathematics Professional Development Institutes, to be administered by the university, in partnership with the California State University and with private, independent universities in California, in accordance with all of the following criteria:

(a) In July 2000, the University of California and its institutes’ partners shall commence instruction for 5,500 participants who either
 provide direct instruction in mathematics to California public high school pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, or supervise beginning teachers of high school mathematics.

(b) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction for school teams from each participating school. The school teams may include both beginning and experienced teachers and the schoolsite administrator.

(2) Criteria and priority for selection of participating school teams shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Schools whose pupils’ scores on the mathematics portion of the achievement test authorized by Section 60640 are at or below the 40th percentile.

(B) Teams composed of a large percentage of members of their schools’ mathematics departments, which may include the chair of that department.

(C) Schools with high poverty levels, as determined by the percentage of pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(D) Schools with a high number of beginning and noncredentialed teachers.

(E) Schools that have adopted standards-based materials approved by the State Board of Education.

(3) In any fiscal year, if funding is inadequate to accommodate the participation of all eligible school teams, first priority shall be given to schools meeting the criteria set forth in subparagraph (D) of paragraph
 (2).

(c) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction in the teaching of mathematics in a manner consistent with the standard for a comprehensive mathematics instruction program that is research-based and shall include all of the following components:

(A) Instruction in topics commonly found in high school mathematics courses, including, but not limited to, geometry, algebra II, trigonometry, and calculus, that will enhance the ability of teachers to prepare pupils for the achievement test authorized pursuant to Section 60640 and to prepare pupils for advanced placement and college coursework.

(B) Ongoing diagnostic techniques that inform teaching and assessment.

(C) Early intervention techniques for pupils experiencing difficulty in mathematics.

(2) Instruction provided pursuant to this section shall be consistent with state-adopted academic content standards and with the curriculum frameworks on mathematics for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that are adopted by the State Board of Education.

(3) Instruction provided pursuant to this section shall acquaint teachers with the value in the diagnostic nature of standardized tests.

(d) In order to provide maximum access, the institutes shall be offered through multiple university and college campuses that are widely distributed throughout the state or in a
 regionally accredited program offered through instructor-led, interactive online courses. In order to maximize access to teachers and administrators who may be precluded from participating in an onsite institute due to geographical, physical, or time constraints, each institute shall be required to accommodate at least 5 percent of the participants through state-approved instructor-led, interactive online courses. Instruction at the institutes shall consist of an intensive, sustained training period of no less than 40 hours nor more than 120 hours during the summer or during an intersession break or an equivalent instructor-led, online course and shall be supplemented, during the following school year, with no fewer than 80 additional hours nor more than 120 additional hours of instruction and schoolsite meetings, held on at least a monthly basis, to focus on the academic progress of that school’s
 pupils in mathematics.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that a local educational agency or postsecondary educational institution that offers an accredited program of professional preparation consider providing partial and proportional credit toward satisfaction of mathematics course requirements to an enrolled candidate who satisfactorily completes a High School Mathematics Professional Development Institute if the institute has been certified by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing as meeting mathematics standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 18.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

99223.

The Regents of the University of California are requested to jointly develop with the Trustees of the California State University and the independent colleges and universities, the Algebra Academies Professional Development Institutes, to be administered by the university, in partnership with the California State University and with private, independent universities in California, in accordance with all of the following criteria:

(a) In July 2000, the University of California and its institutes’ partners shall commence instruction for 1,000 participants who either provide direct instruction in prealgebra and algebra to pupils in grades 7 and 8, or supervise beginning teachers
 of algebra.

(b) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction for school teams from each participating school. These school teams may include both beginning and experienced teachers and the schoolsite administrator.

(2) Criteria and priority for selection of participating school teams shall include, but are not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(A) Schools whose pupils’ scores on the mathematics portion of the achievement test authorized by Section 60640 are at or below the 40th percentile.

(B) Teams composed of a large percentage of members of their schools’ mathematics departments, which may include the chair of that
 department.

(C) Schools with high poverty levels, as determined by the percentage of pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(D) Schools with a high number of beginning and noncredentialed teachers.

(E) Schools that have adopted standards-based materials approved by the State Board of Education.

(3) In any fiscal year, if funding is inadequate to accommodate the participation of all eligible school teams, first priority shall be given to schools that meet the criteria described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2).

(c) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction in the
 teaching of prealgebra and algebra in a manner consistent with the standard for a comprehensive mathematics instruction program that is research-based and shall include all of the following components:

(A) Instruction in prealgebra and algebra that will enhance the ability of teachers to prepare pupils for the achievement test authorized pursuant to Section 60640.

(B) Ongoing diagnostic techniques that inform teaching and assessment.

(C) Early intervention techniques for pupils experiencing difficulty in prealgebra and algebra.

(2) Instruction provided pursuant to this section shall be consistent with state-adopted academic content standards and with the
 curriculum frameworks on mathematics for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that are adopted by the State Board of Education.

(3) Instruction provided pursuant to this section shall acquaint teachers with the value in the diagnostic nature of standardized tests.

(d) Each participant who satisfactorily completes an institute authorized by this section shall receive a stipend, commensurate with the duration of the institute, of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), as determined by the University of California.

(e) In order to provide maximum access, the institutes shall be offered on multiple university and college campuses that are widely distributed
 throughout the state. Instruction at the institutes shall consist of an intensive, sustained training period of no less than 40 hours during the summer or during an intersession break, and shall be supplemented, during the following school year, with no fewer than the equivalent of five additional days of instruction and schoolsite meetings, held on at least a monthly basis, to focus on the academic progress of that school’s pupils in prealgebra and algebra.

(f) Teachers attending the institutes authorized by this section shall, as a condition of attendance and subsequent to that attendance, serve as instructors in the program authorized by Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 53081) of Part 28. These teachers shall continue to receive followup professional development during the same time period they are providing instruction.
 Followup professional development during this time period shall occur outside of instructional time.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that a local educational agency or postsecondary educational institution that offers an accredited program of professional preparation consider providing partial and proportional credit toward satisfaction of mathematics course requirements to an enrolled candidate who satisfactorily completes an Algebra Academies Professional Development Institute program if the institute has been certified by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing as meeting mathematics standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 19.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

99224.

The Regents of the University of California are requested to develop jointly with the Trustees of the California State University and the independent colleges and universities, the Algebra Professional Development Institutes, to be administered by the university, in partnership with the California State University and with private, independent universities in California, in accordance with all of the following criteria:

(a) In July 2000, the University of California and its institutes’ partners shall commence instruction for 5,000 participants who either provide direct instruction in algebra or the coursework in the two years leading to algebra to pupils enrolled in a
 public school in grades 6 to 12, inclusive, or supervise beginning teachers
 of algebra.

(b) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction for school teams from each participating school. These school teams may include both beginning and experienced teachers and the schoolsite administrator.

(2) Criteria and priority for selection of participating school teams shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Schools whose pupils’ scores on the mathematics portion of the achievement examination authorized by Section 60640 are at or below the 40th percentile.

(B) Teams composed of a large percentage of members of their schools’ mathematics departments, which may include
 the chair of that department.

(C) Schools with high poverty levels, as determined by the percentage of pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(D) Schools with a high number of beginning and noncredentialed teachers.

(E) Schools that have adopted standards-based materials approved by the State Board of Education.

(3) In any fiscal year, if funding is inadequate to accommodate the participation of all eligible school teams, first priority shall be given to schools meeting the criteria set forth in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2).

(c) (1) The institutes shall
 provide instruction in the teaching of prealgebra and algebra in a manner consistent with the standard for a comprehensive mathematics instruction program that is research-based, and shall include all of the following components:

(A) Instruction in prealgebra and algebra that will enhance the ability of teachers to prepare pupils for the achievement test authorized pursuant to Section 60640.

(B) Ongoing diagnostic techniques that inform teaching and assessment.

(C) Intervention techniques for pupils experiencing difficulty in prealgebra and algebra.

(2) Instruction provided pursuant to this section shall be consistent with state-adopted academic content standards
 and with the curriculum frameworks on mathematics for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that are adopted by the State Board of Education.

(3) Instruction provided pursuant to this section shall acquaint teachers with the value in the diagnostic nature of standardized tests.

(d) In order to provide maximum access, the institutes shall be offered through multiple university and college campuses that are widely distributed throughout the state or in a regionally accredited program offered through instructor-led, interactive online courses. In order to maximize access to teachers and administrators who may be precluded from participating in an onsite institute due to geographical, physical, or time constraints, each institute shall be required to accommodate at
 least 5 percent of the participants through state-approved instructor-led, interactive online courses. Instruction at the institutes shall consist of an intensive, sustained training period of no less than 40 hours nor more than 120 hours during the summer or during an intersession break or an equivalent instructor-led, online course and shall be supplemented, during the following school year, with no fewer than 80 additional hours nor more than 120 additional hours of instruction and schoolsite meetings, held on at least a monthly basis, to focus on the academic progress of that school’s pupils in prealgebra and algebra.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that a local educational agency or postsecondary educational institution that offers an accredited program of professional preparation consider providing partial and proportional
 credit toward satisfaction of mathematics course requirements to an enrolled candidate who satisfactorily completes a High School Algebra Professional Development Institute program if the institute has been certified by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing as meeting mathematics standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 20.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

99225.

The Regents of the University of California are requested to develop collaboratively with the Trustees of the California State University, the independent colleges and universities, and the county offices of education, the Elementary Mathematics Professional Development Institutes, to be administered by the university, in partnership with the California State University and with private, independent universities in California, in accordance with all of the following criteria:

(a) In July 2000, the University of California and its institutes’ partners shall commence instruction for 5,000 participants who either provide direct instruction in elementary mathematics to pupils
 in grades 4 to 6, inclusive, or supervise beginning teachers of elementary mathematics.

(b) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction for school teams from each participating school. These school teams may include both beginning and experienced teachers and the schoolsite administrator.

(2) Criteria and priority for selection of participating school teams shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Schools whose pupils’ scores on the mathematics portion of the achievement test authorized by Section 60640 are at or below the 40th percentile.

(B) Schools with high poverty levels, as determined by the percentage
 of pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(C) Schools with a high number of beginning and noncredentialed teachers.

(D) Schools that have adopted standards-based materials approved by the State Board of Education.

(3) In any fiscal year, if funding is inadequate to accommodate the participation of all eligible school teams, first priority shall be given to schools meeting the criteria set forth in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2).

(c) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction in the teaching of elementary mathematics in a manner consistent with the standard for a comprehensive mathematics instruction program that is research-based,
 and shall include all of the following components:

(A) Instruction in elementary mathematics that will enhance the ability of teachers to prepare pupils for the achievement test authorized pursuant to Section 60640.

(B) Instruction that will prepare teachers as mathematics specialists and to become teacher trainers at their schools, assuming more of the responsibility for mathematics instruction.

(C) Ongoing diagnostic techniques that inform teaching and assessment.

(D) Early and continuing intervention techniques for pupils experiencing difficulty in elementary mathematics.

(2) Instruction provided
 pursuant to this section shall be consistent with state-adopted academic content standards and with the curriculum frameworks on mathematics for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that are adopted by the State Board of Education.

(3) Instruction provided pursuant to this section shall acquaint teachers with the value in the diagnostic nature of standardized tests.

(d) In order to provide maximum access, the institutes shall be offered through multiple university and college campuses that are widely distributed throughout the state or in a regionally accredited program offered through instructor-led, interactive online courses. In order to maximize access to teachers and administrators who may be precluded from participating in an onsite institute due to geographical,
 physical, or time constraints, each institute shall be required to accommodate at least 5 percent of the participants through state-approved instructor-led, interactive online courses. Instruction at the institutes shall consist of an intensive, sustained training period of no less than 40 hours nor more than 120 hours during the summer or during an intersession break or an equivalent instructor-led, online course, and shall be supplemented, during the following school year, with no fewer than 40 additional hours nor more than 120 additional hours of instruction and schoolsite meetings, held on at least a monthly basis, to focus on the academic progress of that school’s pupils in elementary mathematics.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that a local educational agency or postsecondary educational institution that offers an accredited
 program of professional preparation consider providing partial and proportional credit toward satisfaction of mathematics course requirements to an enrolled candidate who satisfactorily completes an Algebra Professional Development Institute program if the institute has been certified by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing as meeting mathematics standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 21.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

99225.5.

In addition to providing the Legislature with quarterly enrollment and completion reports, the University of California and its partners in administering professional development institutes under this article shall annually contract for an independent evaluation of the professional development institutes authorized by Sections 406, 99220, 99221, 99222, 99224, and 99225. The results of this evaluation shall be reported, in writing, to the Legislature no later than January 1, 2002, and annually thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 986, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

99226.

(a) This article shall apply to the University of California only during periods for which the Legislature has appropriated funds therefor in the annual Budget Act and the Regents of the University of California have accepted the funds.

(b) This article shall not apply to the University of California unless and until the Regents of the University of California act, by resolution, to make it applicable.

(c) The Regents of the University of California are requested to jointly develop with the Trustees of California State University and the independent colleges and universities, the institutes described in this article, to be administered by the University of California, in partnership with the California State University and with private, independent universities in California.

(d) Each participant who satisfactorily completes an institute authorized by this article shall receive a stipend commensurate with the duration of the institute, of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), as determined by the University of California. However, in making this determination, the University of California may not exceed the amount provided in the Budget Act for stipends for each of the institutes authorized by this article and must serve at each institute the number of participants specified pursuant to this section.

(e) Commencing July 2001, and each fiscal year thereafter, the number of participants receiving instruction through each of these institutes shall be designated in the annual Budget Act.

(f) These institutes shall be developed in accordance with all of the criteria specified in each section, as described therein.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on a case-by-case basis, and subject to the concurrence of the State Board of Education that priorities for service to high-need schools are met, the University of California and the programs authorized pursuant to Sections 99220 through 99226, inclusive, may serve prekindergarten teachers, kindergarten teachers, and teachers of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in participating school districts with programs in reading or mathematics when the average of the reading or mathematics portions of the achievement test authorized pursuant to Section 60640 is at or below the priority level for service in schools otherwise served by the California Professional Development Institutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

99227.

Within the criteria and priority for the selection of participating school teams set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Sections 99220, 99221, 99222, 99223, 99224, and 99225, priority for the selection of teachers to participate in the professional development institutes authorized pursuant to those sections shall be determined in the following manner:

(a) Teachers who have not participated in a professional development institute in reading or mathematics that is authorized pursuant to this article shall be accorded first priority for training pursuant to this article.

(b) Teachers who have participated in a professional development institute in reading or mathematics that is authorized pursuant to this article, but who have not yet received supplemental training in the areas specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 99237 shall be accorded second priority for training pursuant to this article.

(c) Teachers who have participated in a professional development institute in reading or mathematics that is authorized pursuant to this article, and have received supplemental training in the areas specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 99237 shall be accorded third priority for training pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 737, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Student Health Care Services [99250. - 99251.]

99250.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply: 

(a) “Commission” means the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls established by Section 8241 of the Government Code.

(b) “Fund” means the College Student Health Center Sexual and Reproductive Health Preparation Fund established by Section 99251.

(c) “Grantee” means any qualifying student health center at a public college or university.

(d) “Medication abortion readiness” includes, but is not limited to, assessment of each
 individual clinic to determine facility and training needs before beginning to provide abortion by medication techniques, purchasing equipment, making facility improvements, establishing clinical protocols, creating patient educational materials, and training staff. “Medication abortion readiness” does not include the provision of abortion by medication techniques.

(e) “Public university student health center” means a clinic providing primary health care services to students that is located on the campus of a university within the University of California or California State University systems. 

(f) “Public university system” means the University of California or the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 740, Sec. 2.   (SB 24)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

99251.

(a) On and after January 1, 2023, each public university student health center shall offer abortion by medication techniques onsite. This service may be performed by providers on staff at the student health center, through telehealth services, or by providers associated with a contracted external agency.

(b) (1) The commission shall administer the College Student Health Center Sexual and Reproductive Health Preparation Fund, which is established by this chapter for the
 purposes of providing private moneys in the form of
 direct allocations to the University of California and the California State University to support medication abortion readiness at each public university student health center. Notwithstanding any other law, the commission is authorized to receive moneys from nonstate entities, including, but not necessarily limited to,
 private sector entities and local and federal government agencies, specifically to support the fund, and deposit these moneys into the fund.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the commission for allocation for purposes of this subdivision. 

(3) The commission shall use fund moneys to do all of the following: 

(A) Allocate
 two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) per campus to the University of California and the California State University. Of these funds, each university system shall provide two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to each public university student health center to pay for the cost, both direct and indirect, of medication abortion readiness. Allowable expenses
 payable from these allocations may
 include, but are not limited to, any of the following: 

(i) Purchase of equipment used in the provision of abortion by medication techniques.

(ii) Facility and security upgrades.

(iii) Costs associated with enabling the campus health center to deliver telehealth services.

(iv) Costs associated with training staff in the provision of abortion by medication techniques.

(v) Staff cost reimbursement and clinical
 revenue offset while staff are in trainings.

(B) Allocate two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to both the University of California and the California State University, to pay for the cost, both direct and indirect, of medication abortion readiness for each university system.
 Allowable expenses payable from these allocations may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Providing 24-hour, backup medical support by telephone to patients who have obtained abortion by medication techniques at a public university student health center.

(ii) One-time fees associated with establishing a corporate account to provide telehealth services.

(iii) Billing specialist consultation.

(C) Maintain a system of financial reporting on all aspects of the fund. The financial reports shall include, but not be limited to, information from public university
 student health centers on their expenditures and activities associated with this chapter.

(D) Support implementation of medication abortion readiness by public university student health centers by measures that may include, but are not limited to, any of the following: 

(i) Assisting student health centers with planning and budgeting.

(ii) Coordinating with student health centers to identify training and other resources.

(iii) Serving as a liaison between each public university system, public university student health centers, and the
 Legislature.

(iv) Collecting, compiling, and analyzing information from public university student health centers to meet the commission’s reporting requirements under subdivision (d).

(E) Pay direct and indirect costs of the commission to administer this chapter, including costs of the hiring of staff.

(4) The requirements of this chapter shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, a total of at least ten million two hundred ninety thousand dollars ($10,290,000) in private funds is made available to the fund in a timely manner on or after January 1, 2020. It is the intent of the Legislature that both of the following occur:

(A) No General Fund moneys shall be appropriated, or otherwise provided, to support the fund or the commission’s costs to administer this chapter.

(B) The commission shall assist public university student health centers in identifying other resources to pay for the costs of medication abortion readiness, and for the costs of providing for abortion by medication techniques.

(5) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted as requiring
 either of the following:

 (A) A public university to use General Fund moneys or student fees for medication abortion
 readiness.

(B) A public university student health center to bill public programs or health insurance providers to support the costs of providing abortion by medication techniques onsite.

(c) Upon request from a public university student health center, the commission shall assist and advise on potential pathways for
 the student health center to bill public programs and health insurance providers to help pay for the costs of providing abortion by medication techniques.

(d) (1) On or before December 31, 2021, and on or before December 31 of each year thereafter until December 31, 2026, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature that includes, but is not necessarily limited to, all of the following information for each reporting period, separately for
 each public university system:

(A) The number of student health centers that provide abortion by medication techniques.

(B) The number of abortions by medication techniques performed at student health centers, disaggregated, to the extent possible, by student health center.

(C) The total amount of funds received by each system and provided to the system’s student health centers that is expended on medication abortion readiness, and, separately, the total
 amount of any other funds expended on medication abortion readiness and the source of those funds, disaggregated by function and, to the extent possible, disaggregated by student health center.

(2) The report required in paragraph (1), and any associated data collection, shall be conducted in accordance with state and federal privacy law, including, but not necessarily limited to, the state Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code), the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), and the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191).

(3) The requirement for submitting reports under paragraph (1) shall become inoperative on January 1,
 2027, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 740, Sec. 2.   (SB 24)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.7. CALIFORNIA BENCH TO SCHOOL INITIATIVE [99275. - 99277.]

99275.

(a) The California Bench to School Initiative is hereby established to create the California Institute on Law, Neuroscience, and Education to promote a collaborative focus on neuroscience, law, education, and social justice to improve literacy outcomes in school settings for youth.

(b) The institute shall include the Memory and Aging Center of the University of California, San Francisco (UCSF), the UCSF/UC College Consortium on Law, Science, and Health Policy, and the UC/CSU California Collaborative for Neurodiversity and Learning. The institute shall be charged with the development, implementation, and management of the initiative in collaboration and partnership with the Office of Youth and Community Restoration.

(c) As used in this chapter:

(1) “Initiative” means the California Bench to School Initiative established in subdivision (a).

(2) “Institute” means the California Institute on Law, Neuroscience, and Education created pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) “UC College” means the college named in Section 92200.

(4) “UCSF” means the University of California, San Francisco.

(5) “UC/CSU California Collaborative for Neurodiversity and Learning” means the collaboration between the University of California, Los Angeles, and California State University, managed by the University of California, Los Angeles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 29.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

99276.

(a) The institute shall perform all of the following duties:

(1) Provide comprehensive analysis of the overlap of science and society by expanding interdisciplinary research on the legal implications of new scientific knowledge in neuroscience.

(2) Promote and conduct interdisciplinary research on socioeconomic factors, such as trauma, abuse, social exclusion, discrimination, poverty, homelessness, and neglect.

(3) Develop interdisciplinary research protocols and approaches to expand the capacity of specialists in different fields to work together.

(4) Provide an annual report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the initiative’s programmatic objectives and budget expenditures.

(5) Conduct longitudinal studies related to the success of teacher preparation and development, pupil interventions, and educational outcomes.

(b) The UC/CSU California Collaborative for Neurodiversity and Learning shall develop curriculum, provide teacher training, professional development, and classroom interventions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 70.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

99277.

(a) Upon receiving funding for purposes of this chapter, UCSF, the UC college named in Section 92200, and the UC/CSU California Collaborative on Neurodiversity and Learning shall each appoint one member from the respective institutions. This group shall be charged with the development and oversight of the initiative and shall function as the institute’s management committee. The management committee shall be permitted, but not obligated, to retain a program director to assist in the implementation of the initiative.

(b) (1) An advisory board, with its title and members to be named by the institute, shall be established to serve as an oversight body